Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6127
Plan of reorganization; public hearing; notice.

The director shall conduct a public hearing regarding a proposed plan of reorganization within one hundred twenty days after the date the completed proposed plan of reorganization is filed pursuant to section 44-6126 unless extended by the director for good cause. Any interested person may appear or otherwise be heard at the public hearing. The director may in his or her discretion continue the public hearing for a reasonable period of time not to exceed sixty days. The mutual insurer shall give such reasonable notice of the public hearing as the director in his or her discretion may require.

Laws 1997, LB 740, § 6.